District of Columbia statutes.
1-315.01

Purposes.

The Council of the District of Columbia (“Council”) declares that it is the policy of the District of Columbia government (“District government”) to:

(1)

Promote better execution of laws, more effective management of the District government and of its agencies and functions, and promote the expeditious administration of public business;

(2)

Reduce expenditures, promote economy, and increase efficiency to the fullest extent practicable with respect to the District government operations; and

(3)

Eliminate overlapping and duplication of effort by means of grouping, consolidating, or coordinating agencies and functions to the fullest extent consistent with the efficient operation of the District government.

Oct. 17, 1981, D.C. Law 4-42, § 2, 28 DCR 3425
This section is referenced in § 1-315.03, § 1-523.01, and § 34-2202.07.
1981 Ed., § 1-299.1.
Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 15-205, the Fiscal Year 2005 the Budget Support Act of 2004, the Fiscal Year 2006 the Budget Support Act of 2005, and D.C. Law 16-192, the Fiscal Year 2007 the Budget Support Act of 2006, see Mayor’s Order 2007-143, June 20, 2007 ( 54 DCR 9598).